Utah statutes.
76-8-1205.   Public assistance fraud defined.
Each of the following persons, who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly
commits any of the following acts, is guilty of public assistance fraud:
(1)  any person who uses, transfers, acquires, traffics in, falsifies, or
possesses any food stamp, food stamp identification card, certificate of
eligibility for medical services, Medicaid identification card, fund transfer
instrument, payment instrument, or public assistance warrant in a manner not
allowed by law;
(2)  any person who fraudulently misappropriates any funds exchanged for food
stamps, any food stamp, food stamp identification card, certificate of
eligibility for medical services, Medicaid identification card, or other
public assistance with which he has been entrusted or that has come into his
possession in connection with his duties in administering any state or
federally funded public assistance program;
(3)  any person who receives an unauthorized payment as a result of acts
described in this section;
(4)  any provider who receives payment or any client who receives benefits
after failing to comply with any applicable requirement in Sections 76-8-1203
and 76-8-1204;
(5)  any provider who files a claim for payment under any state or federally
funded public assistance program for goods or services not provided to or for
a client of that program;
(6)  any provider who files or falsifies a claim, report, or document required
by state or federal law, rule, or provider agreement for goods or services not
authorized under the state or federally funded public assistance program for
which the goods or services were provided;
(7)  any provider who fails to credit the state for payments received from
other sources;
(8)  any provider who bills a client or a client's family for goods or
services not provided, or bills in an amount greater than allowed by law or
rule;
(9)  any client who, while receiving public assistance, acquires income or
resources in excess of the amount he previously reported to the state agency
administering the public assistance, and fails to notify the state agency to
which the client previously reported within 10 days after acquiring the excess
income or resources;
(10)  any person who fails to act as required under Section 76-8-1203 or
76-8-1204 with intent to obtain or help another obtain an "overpayment" as
defined in Section 35A-3-602; and
(11)  any person who obtains an overpayment by violation of Section 76-8-1203
or 76-8-1204.
